Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 42
NORTH IDAHO COLLEGE

Section.

33-4201. North Idaho College.

That the educational institution located in Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, heretofore known as North Idaho Junior College, shall be known after the effective date of this act as North Idaho College; and wherever the name North Idaho Junior College shall appear in any statute, such statute hereby is amended to read North Idaho College as fully and completely as though the said name on said statute was specifically amended herein, and all such statutes shall be construed to refer to and mean North Idaho College.